Lignocaine plus morphine in bolus patient-controlled intravenous analgesia lacks post-operative morphine-sparing effect.Lignocaine has been used successfully to treat burn pain and neuropathic pain. We have conducted a randomized, double-blind trial to assess the morphine-sparing effect of intravenous lignocaine in patients with acute pain. After major abdominal surgery, patients were treated with post-operative patient-controlled intravenous analgesia in two groups: group M (n = 25, morphine 0.2 mg mL-1) and group ML (n = 25, morphine 0.2 mg mL-1 plus lignocaine 3.2 mg mL-1). The patient-controlled analgesia system was programmed to deliver a 5 mL bolus with a 50 mL per 4 h limit; the lockout time was 10 min. Both groups closely resembled each other in terms of demographic data, pain intensity, cumulative morphine dose and the morphine-associated nausea, vomiting and pruritus. However, the sedation scores in group ML patients during the first post-operative day were significantly greater than those in group M. The incidence of lignocaine-related lightheadedness and dry mouth was also significantly greater in group ML than in group M. It was concluded that the addition of lignocaine 3.2 mg mL-1 to morphine 0.2 mg mL-1 given via patient-controlled analgesia system does not provide a post-operative morphine-sparing analgesic effect.A comparison among infusion of lidocaine and dexmedetomidine alone and in combination in subjects undergoing coronary artery bypass graft: a randomized trial.Previous studies have reported the cardioprotective effect of dexmedetomidine and lidocaine. We compared the effect of lidocaine and dexmedetomidine infusion during off-pump coronary artery bypass graft (OPCAB).153 patients undergoing OPCAB were enrolled. The lidocaine group (n=36, Group LIDO) received an infusion of lidocaine 2 mg/kg/h after bolus 1.5 mg/kg; the dexmedetomidine group (n=40, Group DEX) received dexmedetomidine 0.3-0.7 μg/kg/h; the combined group (n=39, Group Combined) received infusion of both drugs; and the control group (n=38) received nothing. We measured serum creatinine kinase-myocardial band (CK-MB) and cardiac troponin I (cTnI) concentration before and immediately after the surgery, postoperative day (POD)#1 and #2. The complication rate and clinical outcomes were compared.The concentration of cTnI was significantly lower in the Group LIDO and Group Combined than the control group on POD#2. The concentration of CK-MB was significantly lower in the Group LIDO and Group Combined compared to the control group on POD#1 and #2 [CK-MB on POD#1: 7.67 (5.78-11.92) vs. 7.18 (5.01-11.72) vs. 13.19 (6.85-23.87) in the Group LIDO, combined and control, respectively, Group LIDO vs. control: p=0.003, Group Combined vs. control: p=0.015]. The AUC of CK-MB was significantly lower in the Group LIDO and Group Combined than the control group. However, clinical variables including complication rate, ICU stay and one-year mortality were not different.Lidocaine infused at 2 mg/kg/h, but not dexmedetomidine infused at 0.3-0.7 μg/kg/h reduced postoperative myocardial injury marker levels compared with the control group. However, no other clinical benefits were observed.Effect of i.v. lignocaine on pain and the endocrine metabolic responses after surgery.Pain intensity, and blood glucose and plasma cortisol concentrations were measured following abdominal hysterectomy in 18 patients allocated randomly to receive either i.v. lignocaine 1.5 mg kg-1 plus 2 mg kg-1 h-1, or saline. The administration of lignocaine resulted in plasma concentrations between 1.5 and 2.0 micrograms ml-1 during the 2-h study period. However, the administration of lignocaine i.v. had no effect on the intensity of pain after surgery, or on the adrenocortical and hyperglycaemic responses to surgery.Systemic lidocaine to improve postoperative quality of recovery after ambulatory laparoscopic surgery.Perioperative systemic lidocaine has been shown to have beneficial postoperative analgesic effects. The only previous study examining the use of lidocaine in the outpatient setting did not detect an opioid-sparing effect after hospital discharge. More importantly, it is unknown whether systemic lidocaine provides a better postoperative quality of recovery to patients undergoing ambulatory surgery. Our objective in the current study was to examine the effect of systemic lidocaine on postoperative quality of recovery in patients undergoing outpatient laparoscopic surgery.The study was a prospective, randomized, double-blind, placebo-controlled clinical trial. Healthy female subjects were randomized to receive lidocaine (1.5 mg/kg bolus followed by a 2 mg/kg/h infusion until the end of the surgical procedure) or the same volume of saline. The primary outcome was the Quality of Recovery-40 questionnaire at 24 hours after surgery. A 10-point difference represents a clinically relevant improvement in quality of recovery based on previously reported values on the mean and range of the Quality of Recovery-40 score in patients after anesthesia and surgery. Other data collected included opioid consumption, pain scores, and time to meet hospital discharge. Data were compared using group t tests and the Wilcoxon exact test. The association between opioid consumption and quality of recovery was evaluated using Spearman ρ. P < 0.01 was used to reject the null hypothesis for the primary outcome.Seventy subjects were recruited and 63 completed the study. There were no baseline differences regarding subject and surgical characteristics between the study groups. Patients in the lidocaine group had better global quality of recovery scores compared with the saline group, median difference of 16 (99% confidence interval [CI], 2-28), P = 0.002. Patients in the lidocaine group met hospital discharge criteria faster than the saline group, mean difference of -26 minutes (95% CI, -6 to -46 minutes) (P = 0.03). After hospital discharge, subjects in the lidocaine group required less oral opioids, median difference of -10 (95% CI, 0 to -30) (oral milligrams morphine equivalents), than the saline group (P = 0.01). There was an inverse association between postoperative opioid consumption and quality of recovery (ρ = 0.64, P < 0.001).Systemic lidocaine improves postoperative quality of recovery in patients undergoing outpatient laparoscopy. Patients who received lidocaine had less opioid consumption, which translated to a better quality of recovery. Lidocaine is a safe, inexpensive, effective strategy to improve quality of recovery after ambulatory surgery.Inhibition of postoperative pain by continuous low-dose intravenous infusion of lidocaine.Intravenous lidocaine has been reported previously to inhibit postoperative pain when given either as single injections or as short infusions in amounts usually causing adverse reactions. To determine the efficacy of a continuous low-dose (2 mg/kg) intravenous infusion of lidocaine, postoperative pain (visual analogue pain scale) and the requirements for postoperative analgesics were measured in a double-blind randomized trial in 20 patients after cholecystectomy. Lidocaine infusion was started 30 min before the operation and continued for 24 hr after surgery (n = 10). Saline was infused in a comparable group of ten patients. The lidocaine-treated patients had significantly lower pain scores during the first day after surgery (P less than 0.001) and required significantly less meperidine during the first (P less than 0.02) and second postoperative days (P less than 0.01). No adverse reactions to lidocaine were observed. Whole blood levels of lidocaine ranged between 1 and 2 micrograms/ml. The results suggest that low-dose continuous infusions of lidocaine decrease the severity of postoperative pain and are devoid of side effects.Non-opioid analgesia improves pain relief and decreases sedation after gastric bypass surgery.Several non-opioid drugs have been shown to provide analgesia during and after surgery. We compared sevoflurane anesthesia with fentanyl analgesia to sevoflurane and non-opioid drug treatment for gastric bypass surgery and recovery.Thirty obese patients (body mass index > 50 kg.m(-2)) undergoing gastric bypass were randomized to receive sevoflurane anesthesia with either fentanyl or a non-opioid regimen including ketorolac, clonidine, lidocaine, ketamine, magnesium sulfate, and methylprednisolone. Morphine use by patient-controlled analgesia (PCA) pump and pain score measured by visual analogue scale were determined in the postanesthesia care unit (PACU) and for the first 16 hr after surgery. Sedation was evaluated in the PACU. Investigators assessing patient outcomes were blinded to the study group.Fentanyl treated patients were more sedated in the PACU compared to the non-opioid group. Non-opioid treated patients required 5.2 +/- 2.6 mg.hr(-1) morphine by PCA during their stay in the PACU while patients anesthetized with fentanyl used 7.8 +/- 3.3 mg.hr(-1) (P < 0.05). Fentanyl and non-opioid treated patients showed no difference in pain score one or 16 hr after surgery.Our results show that non-opioid analgesia produced pain relief and less sedation during recovery from gastric bypass surgery compared to fentanyl.Perioperative intravenous lidocaine infusion on postoperative pain relief in patients undergoing upper abdominal surgery.Due to unpleasant nature and physiological consequences of postoperative pain, search of safe and effective modalities for its management has remained a subject of interest to clinical researchers. Analgesic action of lidocaine infusion in patients with chronic neuropathic pain is well known but its place in relieving postoperative pain is yet to be established. The study aimed to assess the effectiveness of perioperative intravenous lidocaine infusion on postoperative pain intensity and analgesic requirement. Sixty patients undergoing major upper abdominal surgery were recruited in this randomized double blinded study. Thirty patients received lidocaine 2.0% (intravenous bolus 1.5 mg/kg followed by an infusion of 1.5 mg/kg/h), and 30 patients received normal saline according to randomization. The infusion started 30 min before skin incision and stopped 1 h after the end of surgery. Postoperative pain intensity and analgesic (diclofenac) requirement were assessed at the interval 15 minutes for 1 hour then 4 hourly up to 24 hours. The pain intensity at rest and movement as well as the total postoperative analgesic (diclofenac) requirement were significantly lower (142.50 +/- 37.80 mg vs.185.00 +/- 41.31 mg, P<0.001) in lidocaine group. The extubation time was significantly longer in lidocaine group (14.43 +/- 3.50 minutes vs. 6.73 +/- 1.76 minutes, P<0.001). The time for the first dose of analgesic requirement was longer in lidocaine group (60.97 +/- 18.05 minutes vs.15.73 +/- 7.46 minutes, P<0.001). It can be concluded that perioperative infusion of low dose of lidocaine decreases the intensity of postoperative pain, reduces the postoperative analgesic consumption, without causing significant adverse effects in patients undergoing upper abdominal surgery.The effect of perioperative intravenous lidocaine on postoperative pain and immune function.Surgery-associated tissue injury leads to nociception and inflammatory reaction, accompanied by increased production of proinflammatory cytokines. These cytokines can induce peripheral and central sensitization, leading to pain augmentation. Recently, a frequently used local anesthetic, lidocaine, was introduced as a part of a perioperative pain management technique. In addition to its analgesic effects, lidocaine has an antiinflammatory property, decreasing the upregulation of proinflammatory cytokines. We focused on the effects of preincisional and intraoperative IV lidocaine on pain intensity and immune reactivity in the postoperative period.Sixty-five female patients (ASA physical status I-II) scheduled for transabdominal hysterectomy were recruited to this randomized, placebo-controlled study. Thirty-two patients in the treatment group received IV lidocaine starting 20 min before surgery, whereas the control group (33 patients) received a matched saline infusion. Both groups received patient-controlled epidural analgesia during the postoperative period. Blood samples were collected before, 24, 48, and 72 h after surgery to measure ex vivo cytokine production of interleukin (IL)-1 receptor antagonist (IL-1ra) and IL-6, as well lymphocyte mitogenic response to phytohemagglutinin-M. A 10-cm visual analog scale was used to assess pain intensity at rest and after coughing.Patients in the lidocaine + patient-controlled epidural analgesia group experienced less severe postoperative pain in the first 4 and 8 h after surgery (visual analog scale 4/3.7 at rest and 5.3/5 during coughing versus 4.5/4.2 and 6.1/5.3, respectively, in the placebo group). There was significantly less ex vivo production of IL-1ra and IL-6, whereas the lymphocyte proliferation response to phytohemagglutinin-M was better maintained than in the control group.The present findings indicate that preoperative and intraoperative IV lidocaine improves immediate postoperative pain management and reduces surgery-induced immune alterations.The effect of perioperative intravenous lidocaine and ketamine on recovery after abdominal hysterectomy.Perioperative ketamine infusion reduces postoperative pain; perioperative lidocaine infusion reduces postoperative narcotic consumption, speeds recovery of intestinal function, improves postoperative fatigue, and shortens hospital stay. However, it is unknown whether perioperative IV lidocaine and/or ketamine enhances acute functional recovery. We therefore tested the primary hypothesis that perioperative IV lidocaine and/or ketamine in patients undergoing open abdominal hysterectomy improves rehabilitation as measured by a 6-minute walk distance (6-MWD) on the second postoperative morning.Women having open hysterectomy were anesthetized with sevoflurane, followed by patient-controlled morphine. Patients were factorially randomized to one of the following groups: (1) lidocaine and placebo, (2) placebo and ketamine, (3) placebo and placebo, or (4) lidocaine and ketamine. Lidocaine was given as a bolus (1.5 mg/kg), followed by lidocaine infusion of 2 mg/kg/h for the first 2 hours, and then 1.2 mg/kg/h for 24 postoperative hours. Ketamine was given as a bolus (0.35 mg/kg), followed by ketamine infusion of 0.2 mg/kg/h for the first 2 hours, and then 0.12 mg/kg/h for 24 postoperative hours. The primary double-blind outcome was 6-MWD on the second postoperative morning; secondary outcomes included pain scores, opioid consumption, postoperative nausea and vomiting, and fatigue score.The study was stopped after a planned interim analysis of 64 patients showed that lidocaine crossed the preplanned futility boundary, with mean ± SD of 202 ± 66 m versus 202 ± 73 m for lidocaine versus placebo, respectively, and mean difference (interim adjusted 97.5% confidence interval) of 0.93 m (-52, 54) (P = 0.96); the ketamine effect also crossed the futility boundary, with mean ± SD of 193 ± 77 m versus 210 ± 61 m for ketamine versus placebo, respectively, and mean difference (interim adjusted 97.5% confidence interval) of -11 m (-65, 44) (P = 0.54). No interaction between the 2 intervention effects was observed (P = 0.96). Neither intervention significantly influenced any of the secondary outcomes.Our results do not support use of lidocaine or ketamine for improving 6-MWD on the second postoperative day after open hysterectomy.Effects of lidocaine infusion on the sympathetic response to abdominal surgery.Activation of afferent nerves in the area of surgery is a cause for surgical pain and stress. Intravenous (IV) lidocaine has been shown to inhibit postoperative pain. In the present double-blind study, the effects of a continuous IV infusion of lidocaine (2 mg/min) on the sympathoadrenal stress response to surgery were evaluated in 38 patients scheduled for elective cholecystectomy who were randomly assigned to two groups. In one group, lidocaine infusion was started 30 min before the operation and continued for 24 hr after surgery (n = 18). In the second group (n = 20), saline was infused. The increases in heart rate and blood pressure after tracheal intubation were not significantly different between the groups, but tachycardia and hypertension associated with extubation was prevented in patients given lidocaine. Differences in blood pressure and heart rate between the two groups were otherwise not significant intra- or postoperatively, nor were differences in blood glucose or plasma catecholamine concentrations during the first 24 hr after skin incision. Urinary catecholamine concentrations did not differ significantly in the two groups during the first postoperative day, but during the second postoperative day urinary output of epinephrine and norepinephrine were significantly less in the group of patients receiving lidocaine infusion. It was concluded that the IV infusion of lidocaine during and after major abdominal surgery suppresses extubation-induced hypertension and tachycardia but does not inhibit the general sympathetic response during the first postoperative day. However, lidocaine infusion reduces urinary output of catecholamines during the second postoperative day, suggesting a more rapid decline in the sympathoadrenal response postoperatively in the experimental group.Intravenous lidocaine for effective pain relief after inguinal herniorrhaphy: a prospective, randomized, double-blind, placebo-controlled study.This prospective, randomized, double-blind, placebo-controlled study evaluated the effectiveness of intravenous lidocaine to reduce post-operative pain in 64 inguinal herniorrhaphy patients. Intravenous bolus injection of 1.5 mg/kg lidocaine followed by a continuous lidocaine infusion of 2 mg/kg per h was randomly assigned to 32 patients (lidocaine group) and intravenous normal saline bolus injection followed by infusion of normal saline was assigned to 32 other patients (control group). Visual analogue scale pain scores, fentanyl consumption and the frequency at which analgesia was administered from a patient-controlled analgesia device (measured by number of button pushes) were significantly lower in the lidocaine group than in the control group until 12 h after surgery. Total fentanyl consumption (patient-controlled plus investigator-controlled rescue administration) and the total number of button pushes were significantly lower in the lidocaine group than in the control group. It is concluded that intravenous lidocaine injection reduced post-operative pain after inguinal herniorrhaphy, is easy to administer and may have potential to become routine practice for this type of surgery.Lidocaine vs. magnesium: effect on analgesia after a laparoscopic cholecystectomy.This double-blinded study aimed at evaluating and comparing the effects of magnesium and lidocaine on pain, analgesic requirements, bowel function, and quality of sleep in patients undergoing a laparoscopic cholecystectomy (LC).Patients were randomized into three groups (n=40 each). Group M received magnesium sulfate 50 mg/kg intravenously (i.v.), followed by 25 mg/kg/h i.v., group L received lidocaine 2 mg/kg i.v., followed by 2 mg/kg/h i.v., and group P received saline i.v. Bolus doses were given over 15 min before induction of anesthesia, followed by an i.v. infusion through the end of surgery. Intraoperative fentanyl consumption and averaged end-tidal sevoflurane concentration were recorded. Abdominal and shoulder pain were evaluated up to 24 h using a visual analog scale (VAS). Morphine consumption was recorded at 2 and 24 h, together with quality of sleep and time of first flatus.Lidocaine or magnesium reduced anesthetic requirements (P<0.01), pain scores (P<0.05), and morphine consumption (P<0.001) relative to the control group. Lidocaine resulted in lower morphine consumption at 2 h [4.9 + or - 2.3 vs. 6.8 + or - 2.8 (P<0.05)] and lower abdominal VAS scores compared with magnesium (1.8 + or - 0.8 vs. 3.2 + or - 0.9, 2.2 + or - 1 vs. 3.6 + or - 1.6, and 2.1 + or - 1.4 vs. 3.3 + or - 1.9) at 2, 6, and 12 h, respectively (P<0.05). Lidocaine was associated with earlier return of bowel function and magnesium was associated with better sleep quality (P<0.05).I.v. lidocaine and magnesium improved post-operative analgesia and reduced intraoperative and post-operative opioid requirements in patients undergoing LC. The improvement of quality of recovery might facilitate rapid hospital discharge.Pre- and intraoperative lidocaine injection for preemptive analgesics in laparoscopic gastrectomy: a prospective, randomized, double-blind, placebo-controlled study.The preemptive intravenous injection of local anesthetics is known to improve postoperative pains in abdominal surgery. The aim of this study is to assess the effect of intravenous lidocaine injection and analyze the precise amount of pain by computerized patient-controlled analgesia (PCA) in patients who had undergone laparoscopy-assisted distal gastrectomy (LADG).A double-blind placebo control study was designed, and 34 patients undergoing LADG for early gastric cancer were divided into two groups. Preoperatively and throughout the surgery, Group I received intravenous lidocaine injection, and Group C received normal saline injection for placebo. Postoperative outcomes, including the visual analog scale (VAS), the button hit counts (BHC) from PCA, and amount of fentanyl consumed, were measured.The demographic data were similar between the groups. The VAS score, BHC, and fentanyl consumption were lower in Group I compared with Group C (P<.05). In particular, fentanyl consumption and BHC in Group I showed a significant decrease during the first 12 hours of the study (P<.05). Postoperative adverse events showed no difference except that nausea was more frequent in the placebo group (P=.039).In this study, intravenous lidocaine injection showed a significant reduction in fentanyl consumption and pain during the earlier postoperative time with more favorable outcomes.[Is intravenous lidocaine infusion suitable for postoperative pain management?].Intravenous administration of local anaesthetics has repeatedly been recommended for the treatment of chronic pain. Some authors have also reported on their use in postoperative pain management. However, most of these publications are case reports or refer to rather old studies or investigations based on study designs that fail to meet present scientific standards. We therefore performed a randomized prospective, double-blind study in 40 patients undergoing elective tonsillectomy, 20 of whom received an infusion of lidocaine at a dose of 1.5 mg/kg body weight (over 10 min) 30 min before the beginning of surgery, followed by 2 mg/kg body weight per h over 6 h and 0.5 mg/kg body weight per h for another 18 h. The patients in the control group received identical volumes of 0.9% NaCl solution. Mean lidocaine plasma concentrations determined 30 min and 3, 6, and 24 h after the beginning of surgery ranged between 2.29 and 0.58 mug/ml. Postoperative pain evaluation on the visual analogue scale and the 101-point numerical rating scale did not reveal,significantly lower pain scores in the lidocaine group than in the control group. During the first 24 h after surgery 12 patients in the lidocaine group required a total of 550 mg meperidine in addition, while 8 patients in the control group required a total of 300 mg meperidine. The postoperative meperidine consumption was not significantly diffent between the lidocaine group and the control group. Intravenous lidocaine infusion did not significantly reduce postoperative pain after tonsillectomy in the dosage used.Effect of intravenous lignocaine on perioperative stress response and post-surgical ileus in elective open abdominal surgeries: a double-blind randomized controlled trial.Perioperative stress response can be detrimental if excessive and prolonged. Intravenous (i.v.) lignocaine, while being an effective analgesic, has the added benefit of anti-inflammatory activity. This study was done to assess the effect of i.v. lignocaine on operative stress response and post-surgical ileus after elective open abdominal surgeries.Patients (n = 134) were randomized into two groups (n = 67 each) to receive an i.v. infusion of lignocaine (group L) or saline (group S) as a bolus of 1.5 mg/kg at intubation followed by an infusion of 1.5 mg/kg/h throughout the surgery until 1 h post-surgery. Total leukocyte count (TLC), C-reactive protein (CRP) and interleukin-6 (IL-6) levels immediately and 24 h after surgery were compared with preoperative levels. Time to first passage of flatus and stools post-operatively was noted. Post-operative pain scores, analgesic requirements, and incidence of post-operative nausea and vomiting (PONV) were assessed in the two groups.Post-operative surge in TLC, CRP and IL-6 was attenuated in group L as compared to group S (P < 0.001, 0.018, <0.001). Time to passage of flatus and stools was earlier in group L (P = 0.04, 0.02). PONV was lesser in group L at 6 and 18 h post-surgery (<0.001, 0.28). Post-operative pain scores and post-operative morphine requirement were significantly less in group L at each point of time post-operatively (P < 0.001, <0.001).Perioperative i.v. lignocaine infusion attenuates the operative stress response, provides effective analgesia and reduces the need for opioids post-operatively. Through these effects, it reduces post-operative ileus and the incidence of PONV.Intraperitoneal and intravenous lidocaine for effective pain relief after laparoscopic appendectomy: a prospective, randomized, double-blind, placebo-controlled study.The preemptive intravenous and intraperitoneal application of local anesthetics is known to improve the postoperative outcome in abdominal surgery. The aim of this study was to compare the analgesic effect of intravenous lidocaine injection to that of intraperitoneal lidocaine instillation in patients who were undergoing laparoscopic appendectomy (LA).Sixty-eight patients who were undergoing LA for unperforated appendicitis were randomly divided into three groups. Group IP (the intraperitoneal instillation group) received intraperitoneal instillation of lidocaine and intravenous normal saline injection. Group IV (the intravenous injection group) received intravenous lidocaine injection and intraperitoneal instillation of normal saline. In group C (the placebo control group), normal saline was given both intravenously and intraperitoneally. The visual analog scale (VAS) of pain scores was measured after surgery. The needs for additional intravenous fentanyl were evaluated and the integrated fentanyl consumption (PCA delivered + additional fentanyl) was assessed. The incidence of shoulder tip pain and postoperative nausea and vomiting (PONV) were noted.Reduction of the VAS score and of fentanyl consumption was noted in the IV and IP groups and compared to that of group C (P < 0.05). The shoulder tip pain and PONV were reduced in groups IP and IV compared to that in group C (P < 0.05). However, no significant differences were found between the IP and IV groups for all the studied variables. There was no adverse effect from intravenous lidocaine throughout the study.Intravenous lidocaine injection is as effective as intraperitoneal instillation for reducing pain and fentanyl consumption. The major benefit of intravenous injection is that this is an easily and universally applicable procedure compared to that of intraperitoneal instillation. Lidocaine intravenous administration is a better alternative for reducing the pain of patients who are undergoing laparoscopic surgery.Comparison of the effects of thoracic epidural analgesia and i.v. infusion with lidocaine on cytokine response, postoperative pain and bowel function in patients undergoing colonic surgery.Both thoracic epidural analgesia (TEA) and i.v. lidocaine were able to decrease postoperative pain and duration of ileus. We compared TEA and i.v. lidocaine (IV) regarding their effects on cytokines, pain and bowel function after colonic surgery.Sixty patients were randomly allocated to one of the three groups. TEA group had lidocaine 2 mg kg(-1) followed by 3 mg kg(-1) h(-1) epidurally and an equal volume of i.v. normal saline. The IV group received the same amount of lidocaine i.v. and normal saline epidurally. The control group received normal saline via both routes. These regimens were started 30 min before surgery and were continued throughout. Blood cytokines were measured at scheduled times within 72 h.Both TEA and IV groups had better pain relief. The total consumptions using patient-controlled epidural analgesia were 81.6 (6.5), 55.0 (5.3) and 45.6 (3.9) ml (P<0.01) and the times of flatus passage were 50.2 (4.9), 60.2 (5.8) and 71.7 (4.7) h (P<0.01) in the TEA, IV and control groups, respectively. The TEA group exhibited the best postoperative pain relief and the least cytokine surge. The IV group experienced better pain relief and less cytokine release than the control group.The TEA lidocaine had better pain relief, lower opioid consumption, earlier return of bowel function and lesser production of cytokines than IV lidocaine during 72 h after colonic surgery; IV group was better than the control group.Systemic Lidocaine Fails to Improve Postoperative Pain, But Reduces Time to Discharge Readiness in Patients Undergoing Laparoscopic Sterilization in Day-Case Surgery: A Double-Blind, Randomized, Placebo-Controlled Trial.Perioperative systemic lidocaine provides postoperative analgesia, decreases opioid consumption, and facilitates rehabilitation in abdominal surgery. We hypothesized that systemic lidocaine has analgesic effects in women undergoing day-case laparoscopic sterilization.Eighty women were randomized in this prospective, double-blind trial to receive either lidocaine (intravenous bolus of 1.5 mg/kg at induction of anesthesia, followed by an infusion of 1.5 mg · kg · h, which was continued until 30 minutes after arrival at the postanesthesia care unit [PACU]) or placebo. The primary end point was the proportion of patients with a numeric rating scale (NRS) of greater than 3, 30 minutes after arrival at the PACU. Secondary outcomes included total opioid consumption, postoperative pain scores, incidence of postoperative nausea and vomiting, and time to readiness for discharge. This clinical trial was registered (Eudra CT 2011-001315-31).Thirty minutes after PACU admission, the proportion of patients with an NRS score of greater than 3 did not differ between the groups (lidocaine group: 59% vs placebo group: 58%). The postoperative NRS for pain over the entire observation period was not significantly different between lidocaine and placebo groups (mean, 3.1 [SD, 0.7] vs 2.8 [SD, 0.6]; P = 0.4). Groups did not differ with respect to perioperative opioid consumption. Patients in the placebo group suffered significantly less from nausea (NRS: 0.1 [SD, 0.1] [placebo] vs 0.3 [SD, 0.1] [lidocaine]; P = 0.02) and required less postoperative nausea and vomiting rescue medication (1 patient in the placebo group vs 7 in the lidocaine group; P = 0.03). The time to meet hospital discharge criteria was significantly lower in the lidocaine group (median, 177 minutes [range, 96-408 minutes] vs 221 minutes [range, 121-420 minutes]; P = 0.02). The mean lidocaine plasma levels at the end of IV lidocaine infusion was 2.5 (SD, 1.1) μg/mL.In laparoscopic sterilization, systemic lidocaine reduces time to readiness for hospital discharge.Can intravenous lidocaine decrease postsurgical ileus and shorten hospital stay in elective bowel surgery? A pilot study and literature review.This study examined whether systemic infusion of lidocaine, a local anesthetic with anti-inflammatory properties, can decrease surgical pain, length of postsurgical ileus, and hospital stay.Twenty-two patients at a community hospital were randomized into 2 groups. Subjects were allocated to receive either lidocaine or a placebo infusion for the first 24 hours after surgery.Patients in the lidocaine group appeared to report less pain as reflected by a decrease in overall visual analogue scale pain scores 24 hours after surgery. The return of flatus after surgery was not considered significant (lidocaine 68.2 +/- 9.7 hours vs placebo 86.9 +/- 13.6 hours; P = .2802). The return of bowel movement after surgery was considered significant (lidocaine 88.3 +/- 6.08 hours vs placebo group 116 +/- 10.1 hours; P = .0286). The lidocaine group was discharged by mean day 3.76 +/- .24 versus placebo at mean day 4.93 +/- .42; P = .0277.Patients in the lidocaine group had bowel movements >24 hours earlier than those in the placebo group and were discharged earlier.Effect of intravenous lidocaine on postoperative recovery of patients undergoing mastectomy: a double-blind, placebo-controlled randomized trial.One of the modalities of treatment for breast cancer surgery pain is opioids, and opioids are associated with adverse effects such as itching and postoperative nausea and vomiting (PONV). Intravenous (IV) lidocaine has been shown to reduce opioid consumption and to improve overall postoperative outcomes in abdominal surgery. In this study, we tested the effect of intraoperative IV lidocaine infusion on the quality of postoperative recovery after breast cancer surgery.Seventy-one patients undergoing breast cancer surgery were randomly assigned to receive either placebo (group P; n = 34) or IV lidocaine (group L; n = 37, bolus 1.5 mg/kg at induction, then infusion at 2 mg/kg/h, stopped 2 hours after the end of surgery) in a prospective double-blind design. Intraoperative and postoperative morphine consumption was calculated. Postoperative pain scores, PONV, and fatigue were assessed at 2, 24, and 48 hours after surgery. Duration of postoperative hospital stay was recorded.Demographics were the same between the groups. There was no statistically significant difference in intraoperative or postoperative morphine consumption (P = 0.188 and P = 0.758) between groups. Overall pain scores either at rest or activity (P = 0.348 and P = 0.810, respectively), PONV (P = 0.350), fatigue (P = 0.758), or duration of postoperative hospital stay (P = 0.218) were not statistically different.Our findings did not show a significant effect of IV lidocaine during breast cancer surgery on opioid consumption, pain score, PONV, or fatigue, indicating that the benefit of this approach does not generalize across all types of surgery.Intraoperative systemic infusion of lidocaine reduces postoperative pain after lumbar surgery: a double-blinded, randomized, placebo-controlled clinical trial.Analgesic effect of lidocaine infusion on postoperative pain.The aim of this study was to evaluate the analgesic effect of lidocaine infusion on postoperative pain after lumbar microdiscectomy.This study used a prospective, randomized, double-blinded, and placebo-controlled clinical trial.Fifty-one patients participated in this randomized, double-blinded study.The primary outcome was the visual analog scale (VAS) (0-100 mm) pain score at 4 hours after surgery. The secondary outcomes were the VAS pain score at 2, 8, 12, 24, and 48 hours after surgery, the frequency with which patients pushed the button (FPB) of the patient-controlled analgesia system, and the fentanyl consumption at 2, 4, 8, 12, 24, and 48 hours after surgery. Other outcomes were satisfaction scores regarding pain control and the overall recovery process, incidence of postoperative nausea and vomiting (PONV), and length of hospital stay (HS).Preoperatively and throughout the surgery, Group L received intravenous lidocaine infusion (a 1.5-mg/kg bolus followed by a 2-mg/kg/h infusion until the end of the surgical procedure) and Group C received normal saline infusion as a placebo.The VAS scores and fentanyl consumption were significantly lower in Group L compared with Group C except at 48 h after surgery (p<.05). Total fentanyl consumption, total FPB, length of HS, and satisfaction scores were also significantly lower in Group L compared with Group C (p<.05).Intraoperative systemic infusion of lidocaine decreases pain perception during microdiscectomy, thus reducing the consumption of opioid and the severity of postoperative pain. This effect contributes to reduce the length of HS.Intraoperative infusion of lidocaine reduces postoperative fentanyl requirements in patients undergoing laparoscopic cholecystectomy.Lidocaine has been shown to inhibit neural conduction and to have anti-inflammatory properties. The purpose of this study was to determine whether intraoperative lidocaine infusion reduces opioid consumption in the postanesthesia care unit (PACU).Fifty patients were enrolled in this prospective, randomized and observer-blinded study. At induction of anesthesia the control group (n = 25) received fentanyl 3 microg.kg(-1) while the lidocaine group received fentanyl 1.5 microg.kg(-1) and a bolus of lidocaine 1.5 mg.kg(-1) followed by a continuous infusion of lidocaine 2 mg.kg(-1).hr(-1). General anesthesia included propofol, rocuronium, and desflurane titrated to maintain blood pressure and heart rate within set parameters, and the bispectral index between 35 and 50. No supplemental opioids were given during surgery. All patients received acetaminophen, ketorolac, dexamethasone, droperidol and local anesthetics in the skin incision. Patients received fentanyl and ondansetron in the PACU. The primary outcome variable was the amount of fentanyl required in the PACU to establish and to maintain visual analogue scale pain scores < 3.Most patients received fentanyl for pain relief in the PACU, but the cumulative mean dose was lower in the lidocaine group compared to the control group (98 +/- 54 microg, vs 154 +/- 99 microg, respectively, P = 0.018). Lidocaine infusion reduced by 10% the amount of desflurane required (P = 0.012). White-Song scores > 12 were attained by all patients in both groups within 30 min of their arrival in the PACU. Median time from arrival to the PACU to discharge home was similar in both groups, 167.5 min in the control group vs 180 min in the lidocaine group (P = 0.649).Intraoperative lidocaine infusion reduces opioid consumption in the PACU and intraoperative requirements of desflurane.Perioperative intravenous lidocaine decreases the incidence of persistent pain after breast surgery.Breast cancer surgery is associated with a high incidence of persistent postsurgical pain (PPSP). The aim of this study was to evaluate the impact of intravenous (IV) lidocaine on acute and PPSP, analgesic requirements, and sensation abnormalities in patients undergoing surgery for breast cancer.Thirty-six patients participated in this randomized, double-blinded study. Before induction of general anesthesia, patients received a bolus of intravenous lidocaine 1.5 mg/kg followed by a continuous infusion of lidocaine 1.5 mg/kgh (lidocaine group) or an equal volume of saline (control group). The infusion was stopped 1 hour after the skin closure. Pain scores and analgesic consumption were recorded at 2, 4, 24 hours, and then daily for 1 week postoperatively. Three months later, patients were assessed for PPSP and secondary hyperalgesia.Two (11.8%) patients in the lidocaine group and 9 (47.4%) patients in the control group reported PPSP at 3 months follow-up (P=0.031). McGill Pain Questionnaire revealed greater present pain intensity-visual analog scale in the control group (14.6 ± 22.5 vs. 2.6 ± 7.5; P=0.025). Secondary hyperalgesia (area of hyperalgesia/length of surgical incision) was significantly less in the lidocaine group compared with control group (0.2 ± 0.8 vs. 3.2 ± 4.5 cm; P=0.002). The 2 groups were similar in terms of analgesic consumption during the early postoperative period.Intravenous perioperative lidocaine decreases the incidence and severity of PPSP after breast cancer surgery. Prevention of the induction of central hyperalgesia is a potential mechanism.Intravenous lidocaine is as effective as epidural bupivacaine in reducing ileus duration, hospital stay, and pain after open colon resection: a randomized clinical trial.Both postoperative epidural analgesia and intravenous (IV) infusion of local anesthetic have been shown to shorten ileus duration and hospital stay after colon surgery when compared with the use of systemic narcotics alone. However, they have not been compared directly with each other.Prospective, randomized clinical trial was conducted comparing the 2 treatments in open colon surgery patients. Before induction of general anesthesia, patients were randomized either to epidural analgesia (bupivacaine 0.125% and hydromorphone 6 microg/mL were started at 10 mL/hr within 1 hr of the end of surgery) or IV lidocaine (1 mg/min in patients < 70 kg, 2 mg/min in patients > or = 70 kg). Markers of return of bowel function, length of stay, postoperative pain scores, systemic analgesic requirements, and adverse events were recorded and compared between the 2 groups in an intent-to-treat analysis.Study enrollment took place from April 2005 to July 2006. Twenty-two patients were randomized to IV lidocaine therapy and 20 patients to epidural therapy. No statistically significant differences were found between groups in time to return of bowel function or hospital length of stay. The median pain score difference was not statistically significant. No statistically significant differences were found in pain scores for any specific postoperative day or in analgesic consumption.No differences were observed between groups in terms of return of bowel function, duration of hospital stay, and postoperative pain control, suggesting that IV infusion of local anesthetic may be an effective alternative to epidural therapy in patients in whom epidural anesthesia is contraindicated or not desired.Intravenous lidocaine for postmastectomy pain treatment: randomized, blind, placebo controlled clinical trial.Postoperative pain treatment in mastectomy remains a major challenge despite the multimodal approach. The aim of this study was to investigate the analgesic effect of intravenous lidocaine in patients undergoing mastectomy, as well as the postoperative consumption of opioids.After approval by the Human Research Ethics Committee of the Instituto de Medicina Integral Prof. Fernando Figueira in Recife, Pernambuco, a randomized, blind, controlled trial was conducted with intravenous lidocaine at a dose of 3mg/kg infused over 1h in 45 women undergoing mastectomy under general anesthesia. One patient from placebo group was.Groups were similar in age, body mass index, type of surgery, and postoperative need for opioids. Two of 22 patients in lidocaine group and three of 22 patients in placebo group requested opioid (p=0.50). Pain on awakening was identified in 4/22 of lidocaine group and 5/22 of placebo group (p=0.50); in the post-anesthetic recovery room in 14/22 and 12/22 (p=0.37) of lidocaine and placebo groups, respectively. Pain evaluation 24h after surgery showed that 2/22 and 3/22 patients (p=0.50) of lidocaine and placebo groups, respectively, complained of pain.Intravenous lidocaine at a dose of 3mg/kg administered over a period of an hour during mastectomy did not promote additional analgesia compared to placebo in the first 24h, and has not decreased opioid consumption. However, a beneficial effect of intravenous lidocaine in selected and/or other therapeutic regimens patients cannot be ruled out.Equivalent outcomes during postoperative patient-controlled intravenous analgesia with lidocaine plus morphine versus morphine alone.To evaluate a possible opioid-sparing effect of intravenous lidocaine we conducted a randomized, double-blind clinical trial. Patients undergoing intraabdominal surgery under general anesthesia were treated with patient-controlled analgesia (PCA) in three groups: Group 1 (n = 100; morphine 1 mg/mL), Group 2 (n = 44; morphine 1 mg/mL plus lidocaine 10 mg/mL), and Group 3 (n = 51; morphine 1 mg/mL plus lidocaine 20 mg/mL). Pain was evaluated using a 0-10 visual analog scale in the postanesthesia care unit (PACU) during deep inhalation at 15 and 30 min, and at 1, 2, and 4 h after arrival in the PACU, and continued after PACU discharge every 4 h for 36 h. Patients whose pain was more than 4/10 in the PACU received 2.5 mliters of the respective solutions every 7 min until pain was less than 4/10; then PCA was started. The number of bolus and cumulative drug doses during the study were recorded. Along with pain intensity, we assessed vital signs and side effects. Time to acceptance of oral liquids was also determined. Adding lidocaine 10 or 20 mg/mL to PCA morphine 1 mg/mL for acute pain treatment after abdominal surgery yielded no differences in opioid use, pain levels, or side effects.Perioperative lidocaine infusion reduces the incidence of post-mastectomy chronic pain: a double-blind, placebo-controlled randomized trial.Chronic post-surgical pain (CPSP) is a not uncommon complication after mastectomy, with a reported incidence between 20% and 68%. Careful dissection, the use of minimally invasive surgical techniques, and attempts to reduce the associated inflammatory and hyperalgesic responses are suggested methods to prevent CPSP.To determine if the use of perioperative lidocaine infusion is associated with decreased incidence of CPSP after mastectomy.Double-blind, placebo-controlled randomized trial.This is a secondary analysis of data from 61 out of 71 patients who underwent mastectomy for breast cancer. Patients were randomized to either placebo (Group P; n = 27) or intravenous lidocaine (Group L; n = 34, bolus 1.5 mg/kg at induction, then infusion at 2 mg/kg/hr, up to 2 hours after the end of surgery) in a prospective double-blind design. CPSP was assessed at 6 months after surgery. Stepwise logistic regression analysis was performed to assess the efficacy of lidocaine.Overall 12 (20%) patients developed CPSP, 8 (30%) in the placebo group and 4 (12%) in the lidocaine group. Predictive factors for CPSP that remained significant after multivariate analysis included lidocaine (associated with a 20-fold decrease in CPSP, P = 0.013), breast implant placement (associated with a 16-fold increase in CPSP, P = 0.034), and radiotherapy (associated with a 29-fold increase in CPSP, P = 0.008).Small sample size.Perioperative lidocaine administration was associated with a decreased incidence of CPSP, while breast implant placement and radiotherapy were associated with an increased incidence. These findings suggest a protective effect of lidocaine on CPSP development in mastectomy patients.Perioperative systemic lidocaine for postoperative analgesia and recovery after abdominal surgery: a meta-analysis of randomized controlled trials.Postoperative pain management remains a significant challenge after abdominal surgery.The aim of this meta-analysis was to evaluate the efficacy of systemic lidocaine for postoperative pain management and recovery after abdominal surgery.Data were derived from Medline (1966-2010), CINAHL, The Cochrane Central Register of Controlled Trials, and Scopus.Randomized controlled trials of systemic administration of lidocaine for postoperative analgesia and recovery after abdominal surgery in adults, ie, >18 years, were considered.Combined data were analyzed with use of a random-effects model.Data on opioid consumption, postoperative pain intensity, opioid-related side effects, time to first flatus, time to first bowel movement, and length of hospital stay were extracted.Twenty-one trials comparing systemic lidocaine with placebo or blank control for postoperative analgesia and recovery after abdominal surgery were included in this meta-analysis. Weighted mean difference for cumulative analgesic opioid (morphine) consumption 48 hours after surgery was -7.04 mg (95% CI: -10.40, -3.68, I2= 46.1%).Systemic lidocaine also significantly reduced postoperative pain intensity(visual analog scale, 0-100 mm) 6 hours after surgery at rest (weighted mean difference: -8.07 mm (95% CI: -14.69, -1.49); I2 = 90.6%) and during activity (weighted mean difference: -10.56 mm (95% CI: -16.89, -4.23), I2 = 82%). The time to first flatus and bowel movement was significantly shortened with lidocaine intervention by 6.92 hours (95% CI: -9.21, -4.63, I2 = 62.8%) and 11.74 hours (95% CI:-16.97, -6.51, I2 = 0). Moreover, systemic lidocaine also reduced hospital length of stay following the open procedure (weighted mean difference: -0.71 days (95% CI: -1.35, -0.07); I2 = 37.3%).Heterogeneity of study results is the main limitation of this meta-analysis.Perioperative systemic lidocaine may be a useful adjunct for postoperative pain management by decreasing postoperative pain intensity, reducing opioid consumption, facilitating GI function, and shortening length of hospital stay.Meta-analysis of intravenous lidocaine and postoperative recovery after abdominal surgery.Continuous intravenous administration of lidocaine may decrease the duration of ileus and pain after abdominal surgery.Three databases (Medline, Embase and the Cochrane Controlled Trials Register) were searched to retrieve randomized controlled trials comparing continuous intravenous lidocaine infusion during and after abdominal surgery with placebo. Study design was scored using the Oxford Quality Score based on randomization, double-blinding and follow-up. Outcome measures were duration of ileus, length of hospital stay, postoperative pain, and incidence of nausea and vomiting.Eight trials were selected. A total of 161 patients received intravenous lidocaine, with 159 controls. Intravenous lidocaine administration decreased the duration of ileus (weighted mean difference (WMD) - 8.36 h; P < 0.001), length of hospital stay (WMD - 0.84 days; P = 0.002), postoperative pain intensity at 24 h after operation on a 0-100-mm visual analogue scale (WMD - 5.93 mm; P = 0.002), and the incidence of nausea and vomiting (odds ratio 0.39; P = 0.006).Continuous intravenous administration of lidocaine during and after abdominal surgery improves patient rehabilitation and shortens hospital stay.Treatment of postoperative paralytic ileus by intravenous lidocaine infusion.The effects of continuous intravenous infusion of lidocaine on postoperative paralytic ileus in cholecystectomized patients was investigated in this double-blind study. An infusion of lidocaine (3 mg/min, n = 15) or an infusion of an equal volume of saline (n = 15) was started 30 min before induction of anesthesia and continued for 24 h after surgery. Postoperative colonic motility was evaluated by radiopaque markers and serial abdominal radiographs. A record was kept of the first passage of gas and feces. Results showed significantly earlier return of propulsive motility in the colon of lidocaine-treated patients. Radiopaque markers in the lidocaine group were propelled significantly earlier from the cecum/ascending colon to the transverse colon (P less than 0.05) and appeared significantly earlier in the descending colon (P less than 0.05) and the rectosigmoid colon (P less than 0.05) than in saline-treated patients. Despite the fact that the mean time for postoperative defecation occurred 17 h earlier in lidocaine-treated patients, differences between the groups were not statistically significant--a fact due, perhaps, to great individual variations in defecation habits. The time to first passage of gas, a variable representative of changes in anorectal or colonic tone rather than propagative motility, also did not differ significantly between the groups. No adverse reactions to lidocaine were reported. The results suggest that continuous intravenous infusion of lidocaine during the first postoperative day shortens the duration of paralytic ileus in the colon after abdominal surgery. Suppression of inhibitory gastrointestinal reflexes by reduction of postoperative peritoneal irritation is suggested as the mechanism of action.Systemic lidocaine shortens length of hospital stay after colorectal surgery: a double-blinded, randomized, placebo-controlled trial.To characterize the beneficial effects of perioperative systemic lidocaine on length of hospital stay, gastrointestinal motility, and the inflammatory response after colorectal surgery.Surgery-induced stimulation of the inflammatory response plays a major role in the development of several postoperative disorders. Local anesthetics possess anti-inflammatory activity and are thought to positively affect patients' outcome after surgery. This double-blinded, randomized, and placebo-controlled trial aimed to evaluate beneficial effects of systemic lidocaine and to provide insights into underlying mechanisms.Sixty patients undergoing colorectal surgery, not willing or unable to receive an epidural catheter, were randomly assigned to lidocaine or placebo treatment. Before induction of general anesthesia, an intravenous lidocaine bolus (1.5 mg/kg) was administered followed by a continuous lidocaine infusion (2 mg/min) until 4 hours postoperatively. Length of hospital stay, gastrointestinal motility, and pain scores were recorded and plasma levels or expression of pro- and anti-inflammatory mediators determined.Lidocaine significantly accelerated return of bowel function and shortened length of hospital stay by one day. No difference could be observed in daily pain ratings. Elevated plasma levels of IL-6, IL-8, complement C3a, and IL-1ra as well as expression of CD11b, L- and P-selectin, and platelet-leukocyte aggregates were significantly attenuated by systemic lidocaine.Perioperative intravenous lidocaine not only improved gastrointestinal motility but also shortened length of hospital stay significantly. Anti-inflammatory activity modulating the surgery-induced stress response may be one potential mechanism. Systemic lidocaine may thus provide a convenient and inexpensive approach to improve outcome for patients not suitable for epidural anesthesia.Transdermal ketamine as an adjuvant for postoperative analgesia after abdominal gynecological surgery using lidocaine epidural blockade.We examined the postoperative analgesia of a controlled delivery ketamine transdermal patch after minor abdominal gynecological surgery using lidocaine epidural blockade. Fifty-two patients were randomized to one of two groups. Epidural anesthesia was performed with 25 mL 2% plain lidocaine. At the end of the surgical procedure, a controlled delivery transdermal patch containing either ketamine (25 mg/24 h) (Ketamine group) or placebo (Placebo group) was applied. Pain and adverse effects were assessed hourly postoperatively for 24 h. IM dipyrone was available at patient request. The two groups were demographically similar. The time to first rescue analgesic was longer in the Ketamine group (230+/-112 min) compared with the Placebo group (94+/-54 min); (P<0.00001). There were more dipyrone dose injections in 24 h in the Placebo group compared with the Ketamine group (P<0.0001). The incidence of adverse effects was similar between groups. We conclude that the transdermal-controlled delivery of ketamine prolonged the duration of analgesia after minor gynecological procedures.Transdermal delivery of ketamine was an useful adjuvant to postoperative analgesia after epidural lidocaine blockade in the population studied.Intraperitoneal local anesthetics have predominant local analgesic effect: a randomized, double-blind study.It remains unclear whether analgesia from intraperitoneal local anesthetics is via local or central mechanisms. This double-blind clinical trial tests the hypothesis that intraperitoneal local anesthetic is superior to continuous IV infusion for pain management. Primary outcome was morphine consumption during 0 to 24 h.Informed consent was obtained from 60 patients, age 30 to 75 yr, American Society of Anesthesiologists physical status I to II, undergoing abdominal hysterectomy. A computer-generated program randomized patients in parallel arms to group IV: continuous infusion of lidocaine 50 mg/h (10 ml) IV and saline 10 ml/h intermittently intraperitoneal; group IP: injection of lidocaine 50 mg/h (10 ml) once every hour intraperitoneally and continuous infusion of saline 10 ml/h intravenously; and group P (placebo): saline 10 ml/h both intravenously and intermittent intraperitoneal injection. Postoperative morphine consumption, pain intensity, recovery, home discharge, and lidocaine concentrations were measured.Morphine consumption during 0 to 24 h was lower in group IP versus group IV, mean difference -22.6 mg (95% CI, 11.4 to 33.8; P < 0.01). No difference was seen between group IV and group P. The total mean plasma concentration of lidocaine in group IP was significantly lower than group IV, 0 to 4.5 h postoperatively (P = 0.03) with no evidence of systemic toxicity. Pain intensity and other recovery parameters were similar between the groups.The lower supplemental morphine consumption and plasma lidocaine concentration in group IP would confirm that the effects of local anesthetics are likely to be predominant via local intraperitoneal receptors or anti-inflammatory effects and not via central mechanisms alone.Intraoperative intravenous lidocaine exerts a protective effect on cell-mediated immunity in patients undergoing radical hysterectomy.Surgical procedures cause a decrease in lymphocyte proliferation rate, an increase in apoptosis and shifts the balance of T‑helper (Th)1/Th2 cells towards anti‑cell‑mediated immunity (CMI) Th2 dominance, which is relevant to the immunosuppressive effects of CMI, postoperative septic complications and the formation of tumor metastasis. Previous studies have revealed that lidocaine exhibits antibacterial actions; regulating inflammatory responses, reducing postoperative pain and affecting the duration spent in hospital. Thus, the present study hypothesized that lidocaine may exert a protective effect on the CMI of patients undergoing surgery for the removal of a primary tumor. A total of 30 adult female patients diagnosed with cervical cancer were recruited to the present study and were randomized into two groups. The lidocaine group received an intravenous bolus dose of 1.5 mg/kg lidocaine, followed by continuous infusion at 1.5 mg/kg/h until discharge from the operating room. The control group received the same volume of normal saline. A 10 ml sample of venous blood was drawn, and the lymphocytes were isolated using Ficoll‑paque 1 day prior to surgery, at discharge from the operating room and 48 h post‑surgery. The proliferation rate of the lymphocytes was assessed using a Cell Counting Kit‑8 assay and was found to be higher in the lidocaine group. The early apoptosis of lymphocytes was attenuated following lidocaine treatment at 48 h post‑surgery, as detected using flow cytometry with Annexin V‑fluorescein isothiocyanate/propidium iodide staining. The level of interferon (IFN)‑γ in the serum at 48 h was significantly decreased following surgery in the control group, compared with the pre‑surgical values (3.782 ± 0.282, vs. 4.089 ± 0.339 pg/ml, respectively) and the ratio of IFN‑γ to interleukin‑4 was well preserved in the lidocaine group. In conclusion, the present study demonstrated that the intraoperative systemic administration of lidocaine exerted a protective effect on CMI in patients with cervical cancer undergoing radical hysterectomy. This may be beneficial in reducing the occurrence of postoperative septic complications and tumor metastasis formation.Lack of impact of intravenous lidocaine on analgesia, functional recovery, and nociceptive pain threshold after total hip arthroplasty.The analgesic effect of perioperative low doses of intravenous lidocaine has been demonstrated after abdominal surgery. This study aimed to evaluate whether a continuous intravenous low-dose lidocaine infusion reduced postoperative pain and modified nociceptive pain threshold after total hip arthroplasty.Sixty patients participated in this randomized double-blinded study. Patients received lidocaine 1% (lidocaine group) with a 1.5 mg/kg intravenous bolus in 10 min followed by a 1.5 mg . kg . h intravenous infusion or saline (control group). These regimens were started 30 min before surgical incision and stopped 1h after skin closure. Lidocaine blood concentrations were measured at the end of administration. In both groups, postoperative analgesia was provided exclusively by patient-controlled intravenous morphine. Pain scores, morphine consumption, and operative hip flexion were recorded over 48 h. In addition, pressure pain thresholds and the extent of hyperalgesia around surgical incision were systematically measured at 24 and 48 h.In comparison with the placebo, lidocaine did not induce any opioid-sparing effect during the first 24 h (median [25-75% interquartile range]; 17 mg [9-28] vs. 15 mg [8-23]; P = 0.54). There was no significant difference regarding the effects of lidocaine and placebo on pain score, pressure pain thresholds, extent in the area of hyperalgesia, and maximal degree of active hip flexion tolerated. Mean plasma lidocaine concentration was 2.1 +/- 0.4 mug/ml.Low dose perioperative intravenous lidocaine after total hip arthroplasty offers no beneficial effect on postoperative analgesia and does not modify pressure and tactile pain thresholds.Intravenous lidocaine does not reduce length of hospital stay following abdominal hysterectomy.Intravenous lidocaine given both intraoperatively and postoperatively decreases pain scores, reduces opioid consumption, and promotes faster return of bowel function following abdominal surgery. The purpose of this trial was to determine if intravenous lidocaine limited to the intraoperative period reduces length of hospital stay and improves functional recovery following abdominal hysterectomy.Following Research Ethics Board approval and informed consent, women of American Society of Anesthesiologists' class I and II undergoing abdominal hysterectomy were assigned randomly to lidocaine and control groups. Lidocaine subjects received an intravenous bolus of 1.5 mg.kg(-1) followed by an infusion of 3 mg.kg(-1).hr(-1), while control subjects received matching placebo. Patients, anesthesiologists, and study personnel were blinded, and anesthesia and multimodal perioperative analgesia were standardized. The primary outcome of this trial was discharge from hospital on or before the second postoperative day (POD2). Additional criteria were assessed for secondary outcomes, i.e., discharge fitness on POD2, length of hospital stay, opioid use, numeric rating scores for pain, quality of recovery, and recovery of bowel function.Ninety of the 93 women who were recruited completed the study protocol. The characteristics of the patients in both groups were similar-lidocaine group (n = 44) and control group (n = 46)-and no difference was noted between groups in the numbers of women discharged from hospital on POD2 (10 lidocaine, 15 control; P = 0.295). Days to discharge fitness (P = 0.666) and length of hospital stay (P = 0.456) were also similar. Differences in opioid consumption, pain scores, and recovery were neither clinically nor statistically significant.Intraoperative administration of intravenous lidocaine did not reduce hospital stay or improve objective measures of analgesia and recovery following abdominal hysterectomy. This trial was registered at ClinicalTrials.gov (NCT00382499).Perioperative intravenous lidocaine has preventive effects on postoperative pain and morphine consumption after major abdominal surgery.Sodium channel blockers are approved for IV administration in the treatment of neuropathic pain states. Preclinical studies have suggested antihyperalgesic effects on the peripheral and central nervous system. Our objective in this study was to determine the time course of the analgesic and antihyperalgesic mechanisms of perioperative lidocaine administration. Forty patients undergoing major abdominal surgery participated in this randomized and double-blinded study. Twenty patients received lidocaine 2% (bolus injection of 1.5 mg/kg in 10 min followed by an IV infusion of 1.5 mg. kg(-1). h(-1)), and 20 patients received saline placebo. The infusion started 30 min before skin incision and was stopped 1 h after the end of surgery. Lidocaine blood concentrations were measured. Postoperative pain ratings (numeric rating scale of 0-10) and morphine consumption (patient-controlled analgesia) were assessed up to 72 h after surgery. Mean lidocaine levels during surgery were 1.9 +/- 0.7 microg/mL. Patient-controlled analgesia with morphine produced good postoperative analgesia (numeric rating scale at rest, <or=3; 90%-95%; no group differences). Patients who received lidocaine reported less pain during movement and needed less morphine during the first 72 h after surgery (103.1 +/- 72.0 mg versus 159.0 +/- 73.3 mg; Student's t-test; P < 0.05). Because this opioid-sparing effect was most pronounced on the third postoperative day, IV lidocaine may have a true preventive analgesic activity, most likely by preventing the induction of central hyperalgesia in a clinically relevant manner.The perioperative administration of systemic small-dose lidocaine reduces pain during surgery associated with the development of pronounced central hyperalgesia, presumably by affecting mechanoinsensitive nociceptors, because these have been linked to the induction of central sensitization and were shown to be particularly sensitive to small-dose lidocaine.Lidocaine and the inhibition of postoperative pain in coronary artery bypass patients.This study was designed to evaluate whether a continuous low-dose lidocaine infusion reduces postoperative pain and anxiety in patients undergoing coronary artery bypass grafting (CABG) and to retrospectively examine time to extubation, intensive care unit stay (ICU), and hospital length of stay.A double-blinded, randomized, and prospective approach.Hospital patients undergoing first-time CABG.After informed consent, 100 patients were enrolled in this study.Lidocaine infusion or placebo substitute was begun after induction of anesthesia. The fentanyl/midazolam infusion was discontinued on ICU admission; lidocaine or placebo continued until ICU discharge. Supplemental fentanyl, midazolam, or propranolol was administered for pain, anxiety, or hemodynamic stress.Drug dosages were compared between groups. Postoperative assessment included visual analog pain score, hemodynamics, sedation score, and nursing assessment. Mean total dosages of fentanyl, midazolam, and propranolol between the lidocaine and placebo groups were 620.40 +/- 815.74 microgram versus 689.16 +/- 692.99 microgram, p = 0.244; 0.54 +/- 1.13 mg versus 1.20 +/- 2.44 mg p = 0.465; 0.11 +/- 0.75 mg versus 3.56 +/- 17.2 mg, p = 0.564, respectively. Times to extubation, ICU length of stay, and hospital stay did not achieve statistical significance.Continuous infusion of low-dose lidocaine did not significantly decrease supplemental fentanyl, midazolam, or propranolol requirement postoperatively. Similarly, a lidocaine infusion does not result in reduced time to extubation. ICU stay, or hospital length of stay.Comparison Between Intraperitoneal and Intravenous Lidocaine for Postoperative Analgesia After Elective Abdominal Hysterectomy, a Double-Blind Placebo Controlled Study.To compare the efficacy of intravenous and intraperitoneal injection of lidocaine and normal saline in relieving postoperative pain after elective abdominal hysterectomy.For this double-blind randomized controlled study 109 patients undergoing elective abdominal hysterectomy were randomly allocated to three groups :1) IV group (intravenous injection group) received intravenous lidocaine %2 bolus 1.5mg/kg 30 min before incision and then a continuous lidocaine infusion of 2mg/kg and before the wound closure an intraperitoneal injection of N/S , 2) IP group (intraperitoneal group) received intravenous N/S and intraperitoneal lidocaine 3mg/kg , 3) P group (placebo, N/S) received both intravenous and intraperitoneal N/S. The pain scores (VAS) at rest, total morphine consumption , the time to first need for rescue analgesic ,incidence of lidocaine related adverse effects and nausea and vomiting were recorded at 0,2,4,8,12 and 24 hrs postoperatively.The VAS scores were significantly lower in IP and IV groups compared with placebo (p = 0.001). Total consumption of morphine (p = 0.001) and time to firs request of recue analgesic (p = 0.001) were lower too in IP and IV groups.Incidence of vomiting was comparable between groups (p < 0.05) but nausea was higher in control group (p > 0.05).There were not notable lidocaine-related adverse effects. IP and IV groups were not statistically different for all investigated variables.This study showed lidocaine administration both intravenously and intraperitoneally are effective in reducing the postoperative pain and also have opioid sparing effect and can be safely used in elective abdominal hysterectomy without any major adverse effects.Randomized, double-blinded, placebo controlled study of neuroprotection with lidocaine in cardiac surgery.Cognitive decline after cardiac surgery remains common and diminishes patients' quality of life. Based on experimental and clinical evidence, this study assessed the potential of intravenously administered lidocaine to reduce postoperative cognitive dysfunction after cardiac surgery using cardiopulmonary bypass.After IRB approval, 277 patients undergoing cardiac surgery were enrolled into this prospective, randomized, double-blinded placebo controlled clinical trial. Subjects were randomized to receive: (1) Lidocaine as a 1 mg/kg bolus followed by a continuous infusion through 48 hours postoperatively, or (2) Placebo bolus and infusion. Cognitive function was assessed preoperatively and again at 6 weeks and 1 year postoperatively. The effect of lidocaine on postoperative cognition was tested using multivariable regression modeling; P<0.05 was considered significant.Among the 241 allocated subjects (Lidocaine: n=114; Placebo: n=127), the incidence of cognitive deficit in the lidocaine group was 45.5% versus 45.7% in the placebo group (P=0.97). Multivariable analysis revealed a significant interaction between treatment group and diabetes, such that diabetic subjects receiving lidocaine were more likely to suffer cognitive decline (P=0.004). Secondary analysis identified total lidocaine dose (mg/kg) as a significant predictor of cognitive decline and also revealed a protective effect of lower dose lidocaine in nondiabetic subjects.Lidocaine administered during and after cardiac surgery does not reduce the high rate of postoperative cognitive dysfunction. Higher doses of lidocaine and diabetic status were independent predictors of cognitive decline. Protective effects of lower dose lidocaine in nondiabetic subjects need to be further evaluated.Intravenous lidocaine for effective pain relief after a laparoscopic colectomy: a prospective, randomized, double-blind, placebo-controlled study.A perioperative intravenous lidocaine infusion has been reported to decrease postoperative pain. The goal of this study was to evaluate the effectiveness of intravenous lidocaine in reducing postoperative pain for laparoscopic colectomy patients. Fifty-five patients scheduled for an elective laparoscopic colectomy were randomly assigned to 2 groups. Group L received an intravenous bolus injection of lidocaine 1.5 mg/kg before intubation, followed by 2 mg/kg/h continuous infusion during the operation. Group C received the same dosage of saline at the same time. Postoperative pain was assessed at 2, 4, 8, 12, 24, and 48 hours after surgery by using the visual analog scale (VAS). Fentanyl consumption by patient-controlled plus investigator-controlled rescue administration and the total number of button pushes were measured at 2, 4, 8, 12, 24, and 48 hours after surgery. In addition, C-reactive protein (CRP) levels were checked on the operation day and postoperative days 1, 2, 3, and 5. VAS scores were significantly lower in group L than group C until 24 hours after surgery. Fentanyl consumption was lower in group L than group C until 12 hours after surgery. Moreover, additional fentanyl injections and the total number of button pushes appeared to be lower in group L than group C (P < 0.05). The CRP level tended to be lower in group L than group C, especially on postoperative day 1 and 2 and appeared to be statistically significant. The satisfaction score was higher in group L than group C (P = 0.024). Intravenous lidocaine infusion during an operation reduces pain after a laparoscopic colectomy.[Effects of small-dose lidocaine combined with ketamine on early postoperative cognitive function in elderly patients undergoing gastrointestinal tumor surgery].To observe the effects of anesthetic intervention with small-dose lidocaine and ketamine on early postoperative cognitive function in elderly patients undergoing surgeries for gastrointestinal tumors.Sixty patients (ASA I-III, aged 63-82 years) scheduled for surgeries for gastrointestinal tumors were randomized into intervention group (n=30) and control group (n=30). After intravenous induction and tracheal intubation, the patients in the interventional group received intravenous infusion of 0.5 mg/kg lidocaine and 0.5 mg/kg ketamine, followed by continuous infusion of lidocaine at the rate of 0.5 mg·kg(-1)·h(-1) till the end of the operation; the patients in the control group received saline infusion only. The cognitive function of the patients was assessed at 3 day before and 2 day after the operation using comprehensive neuro-psychological tests. Peripheral venous blood was extracted before anesthesia induction (T0), at the end of the surgery (T1), and at 1 day (T2) and 2 days (T3) after the operation for measurement of serum S-100β protein, NSE and IL-6 levels using ELISA.The difference between the test scores before and after the operation (X values) was significantly smaller in the intervention group than in the control group (P<0.05). The intervention group showed a significantly lower incidence rate of postoperative cognitive dysfunction (POCD) than the control group (6.7% vs 33.3%, P<0.05). Compared with the control group, the intervention group exhibited significantly lower serum levels of S-100β protein, NSE and IL-6 at T1 (P<0.05), significantly lower NSE and IL-6 levels at T2 (P<0.05) time point, and significantly lower IL-6 level at T3 (P<0.05).Intravenous injection of small-dose lidocaine and ketamine during the operation can reduce the incidence of POCD in elderly patients undergoing surgeries for gastrointestinal tumors possibly in relation to decreased serum S-100β, NSE and IL-6 levels.Effect of intraoperative lidocaine on anesthetic consumption, and bowel function, pain intensity, analgesic consumption and hospital stay after breast surgery.Perioperative lidocaine infusion improves postoperative outcomes, mostly after abdominal and urologic surgeries. Knowledge of the effect of lidocaine on peripheral surgeries is limited. Presently, we investigated whether intraoperative lidocaine infusion reduced anesthetic consumption, duration of ileus, pain intensity, analgesic consumption and hospital stay after breast plastic surgeries.Sixty female patients, aged 20-60 years, enrolled in this prospective study were randomly and equally divided to two groups. One group (n = 30) received a 1.5 mg/kg bolus of lidocaine approximately 30 min before incision followed by continuous infusion of lidocaine (1.5 mg/kg/h) until skin closure (lidocaine group). The other group (n = 30) was untreated (control group). Balanced inhalation (sevoflurane) anesthesia and multimodal postoperative analgesia were standardized. End tidal sevoflurane concentration during surgery, time to the first flatus and defecation, visual analog pain scale (0-10), analgesic consumption and associated side effects at 24, 48, and 72 h after surgery, hospital stay, and patient's general satisfaction were assessed.Compared to the control group, intraoperative lidocaine infusion reduced by 5% the amount of sevoflurane required at similar bispectral index (P = 0.014). However, there were no significant effects of lidocaine regarding the return of bowel function, postoperative pain intensity, analgesic sparing and side effects at all time points, hospital stay, and level of patient's satisfaction for pain control.Low dose intraoperative lidocaine infusion offered no beneficial effects on return of bowel function, opioid sparing, pain intensity and hospital stay after various breast plastic surgeries.Functional walking capacity as an outcome measure of laparoscopic prostatectomy: the effect of lidocaine infusion.Intravenous lidocaine infusion has been shown to affect postoperative pain intensity. This present study was performed to assess the effect of intra- and postoperative lidocaine infusion on postoperative functional walking capacity, as a measure of surgical recovery.Forty patients undergoing laparoscopic prostatectomy were randomized to receive an i.v. infusion of either lidocaine 2 mg kg(-1) h(-1) during surgery and 1 mg kg(-1) min(-1) for the first 24 postoperative hours (lidocaine group) or an equivalent volume of saline 0.9% (control group). All patients received postoperative patient-controlled analgesia with i.v. morphine. Primary outcome was functional walking capacity, as assessed by distance attained during the 2 min walking test (2MWT), recorded daily for the first 3 postoperative days. Morphine consumption and pain intensity were recorded.2MWT distance decreased by an average of 60% (P<0.01) in both groups on postoperative day 1 (from 150 m before surgery to 53 m), but the decrease was 26 m less in the lidocaine group (P=0.009). During postoperative days 2 and 3, the 2MWT distance increased to an average of 96 m, still 30% less than the preoperative values. There was a significant negative correlation on postoperative days 1 and 2 between the 2MWT distance, pain intensity and fatigue, and morphine consumption. Lidocaine infusion was an independent predictor of the degree of postoperative decrease in 2MWT distance. More patients in the lidocaine group were free from PCA on the second postoperative day (P=0.011).Infusion of lidocaine during surgery and for the first postoperative day attenuated the deterioration in functional walking capacity, and had an opioid sparing effect.Intravenous lidocaine for post-operative pain relief after hand-assisted laparoscopic colon surgery: a randomized, placebo-controlled clinical trial.Perioperative intravenous (IV) infusion of lidocaine has been shown to decrease post-operative pain, shorten time to return of bowel function, and reduce the length of hospital stay. This randomized, prospective, double-blinded, placebo-controlled clinical trial evaluated the impact of IV lidocaine on the quality of post-operative analgesia and other outcomes after hand-assisted laparoscopic colon surgery.Sixty four patients with colon cancer scheduled for elective colon resection were involved in this study. Patients were randomized to receive either lidocaine infusion [lidocaine group (LG)] or normal 0.9 % saline infusion [placebo group (PG)] for a period of 24 h. Anaesthetic and surgical techniques were standardized. Twenty-four-hour post-operative analgesia in the recovery area was maintained by continuous infusion of 0.1 μg/kg/h fentanyl. The primary outcome of the study was post-operative pain control. Pain was assessed using visual analogue scale (VAS) scores at 2, 4, 8, 12, and 24 h after surgery. Patients with a VAS score >3 were treated with ketorolac 30 mg as needed. Secondary outcomes included time to resumption of bowel function and length of hospital stay. Data in the two groups were compared using the two-tailed Student's t test. All statistical tests were two-tailed at a significance level of 0.05.Demographic characteristics and clinical features of both groups were similar. Intensity of pain at rest in LG compared with PG was significantly lower during the first 24 h post-operatively. LG patients reported significantly less pain during movements at 2-, 12-, and 24-h post-surgery than PG patients. The study showed that ketorolac consumption was significantly higher in PG: mean ketorolac consumption in LG was 43.77 ± 13.86 mg and in PG 51.67 ± 13.16 mg (p = 0.047). Compared with placebo, lidocaine infusion produced a 32 % reduction in time to the first drink (Cohen's d = 3.85), 16 % reduction in time to the first full diet (Cohen's d = 3.35), and 18 % reduction in time to the first bowel movement (Cohen's d = 2.30). Patients who received lidocaine stayed in hospital 1.2 days less than patients who received placebo (p < 0.01, Cohen's d = 0.72). There were no significant differences in surgery-related complications between the two groups.Perioperative continuous IV lidocaine infusion has a beneficial effect as regards post-operative pain, restoration of bowel function, and length of hospital stay in patients who have undergone hand-assisted laparoscopic colon surgery.A randomised controlled trial of peri-operative lidocaine infusions for open radical prostatectomy.We allocated 76 men scheduled for radical retropubic prostatectomy to peri-operative lidocaine 2% or saline 0.9%: a pre-operative 0.075 ml.kg(-1) intravenous bolus; an intra-operative intravenous infusion at 0.075 ml.kg(-1) .h(-1) ; and 24 hours' postoperative subcutaneous infusion at 0.075 ml.kg(-1) .h(-1) . Lidocaine reduced the postoperative hospital stay by a mean (95% CI) of 1.3 (0.3-2.4) days, p = 0.017, from a mean (SD) of 4.6 (3.2) days with saline. There were no significant differences in pain at rest or on coughing at 24 h. [corrected]. Lidocaine reduced 24-h morphine consumption by a mean (95% CI) of 13.9 (2.2-25.7) mg, p = 0.021, from a mean (SD) of 52.3 (26.9) mg with saline. There were no differences in other outcomes.Effects of intravenous versus epidural lidocaine infusion on pain intensity and bowel function after major large bowel surgery: a double-blind randomized controlled trial.We compared the effects of intravenous lidocaine (IVL) with lumbar epidural lidocaine analgesia (LEA) on pain and ileus after open colonic surgery.Between December 2011 and February 2013, 60 patients were randomly allocated to IVL, LEA, or control group. The IVL group received intraoperatively lidocaine 2 % intravenously (1.5 mg/kg bolus, 2 mg/kg/h infusion) and normal saline (NS) epidurally. The LEA group received lidocaine epidurally (1.5 mg/kg bolus, 2 mg/kg/h infusion) and NS intravenously. The control group received NS both intravenously and epidurally, as bolus and infusion. All NS volumes were calculated as if containing lidocaine 2 % at the aforementioned doses. We assessed pain intensity at rest/cough at 1, 2, 4, 12, 24, and 48 h postoperatively (numerical rating scale 0-10), 48-h analgesic consumption, and time to first flatus passage.Data from 60 patients (20 per group) were analyzed. The IVL group had significantly lower pain scores at rest and cough compared to LEA or control group only at 1, 2, and 4 h postoperatively (P < 0.005 for all comparisons). The 48-h analgesic requirements and time to first flatus passage did not differ significantly between IVL group and LEA or control group (P > 0.05).Compared with LEA-lidocaine or placebo, intravenous lidocaine offered no clinically significant benefit in terms of analgesia and bowel function.Impact of intravenous lidocaine infusion on postoperative analgesia and recovery from surgery: a systematic review of randomized controlled trials.Postoperative pain continues to be inadequately managed. While opioids remain the mainstay for postoperative analgesia, their use can be associated with adverse effects, including ileus, which can prolong hospital stay. A number of studies have investigated the use of perioperative intravenous lidocaine infusion for improving postoperative analgesia and enhancing recovery of bowel function. This systematic review was performed to determine the overall efficacy of intravenous lidocaine infusion on postoperative analgesia and recovery from surgery in patients undergoing various surgical procedures. We searched the databases of MEDLINE, CINAHL and the Cochrane Library from 1966 to December 2009. We searched for randomized controlled comparisons of lidocaine infusion with placebo in the surgical setting and reporting on postoperative analgesia and other aspects of patient recovery from surgery. The quality of all included studies was assessed using the Modified Oxford Scale. Information on postoperative pain intensity and analgesic requirements was extracted from the trials and compared qualitatively. Other relevant data such as return of bowel function, length of hospital stay, intraoperative anaesthetic requirement and adverse effects were also compared. Sixteen trials were included. A total of 395 patients received intravenous lidocaine with 369 controls. In open and laparoscopic abdominal surgery, as well as in ambulatory surgery patients, intravenous perioperative infusion of lidocaine resulted in significant reductions in postoperative pain intensity and opioid consumption. Pain scores were reduced at rest and with cough or movement for up to 48 hours postoperatively. Opioid consumption was reduced by up to 85% in lidocaine-treated patients when compared with controls. Infusion of lidocaine also resulted in earlier return of bowel function, allowing for earlier rehabilitation and shorter duration of hospital stay. First flatus occurred up to 23 hours earlier, while first bowel movement occurred up to 28 hours earlier in the lidocaine-treated patients. Duration of hospital stay was reduced by an average of 1.1 days in the lidocaine-treated patients. Administration of intravenous lidocaine infusion did not result in toxicity or clinically significant adverse events. Lidocaine had no impact on postoperative analgesia in patients undergoing tonsillectomy, total hip arthroplasty or coronary artery bypass surgery. In conclusion, intravenous lidocaine infusion in the perioperative period is safe and has clear advantages in patients undergoing abdominal surgery. Patients receiving lidocaine infusion had lower pain scores, reduced postoperative analgesic requirements and decreased intraoperative anaesthetic requirements, as well as faster return of bowel function and decreased length of hospital stay. Further studies are needed to assess whether lidocaine has a beneficial effect in patients undergoing other types of surgery and to determine the optimum dose, timing and duration of infusion of lidocaine in this setting.Systemic administration of lidocaine reduces morphine requirements and postoperative pain of patients undergoing thoracic surgery after propofol-remifentanil-based anaesthesia.Remifentanil is being increasingly used as an analgesic in fast-track surgery, but severe postoperative pain may happen occasionally. In this study, we evaluated the effects of systemic administration of lidocaine on postoperative pain and morphine requirements after propofol-remifentanil-based anaesthesia.Forty patients undergoing thoracic surgery were randomly assigned to lidocaine (33.0 microg kg(-1) min(-1)) and physiological saline control groups in propofol-remifentanil-based anaesthesia. The setting of the plasma concentration (C(p)) of the target-controlled infusion of propofol was adjusted according to the bispectral index of the electroencephalogram and blood pressure. The C(p) and effect-site concentration (C(e)) of propofol were calculated by target-controlled infusion pump during the intraoperative period. Pain scoring includes a four-point verbal rating scale, Riker's sedation-agitation scale and a visual analogue scale; the morphine requirement in the postanaesthesia care unit and the morphine consumption via a patient-controlled analgesia device on the ward were recorded during the postoperative period.Morphine requirements within 30, 30-60 and 0-120 min in the postanaesthesia care unit of the lidocaine group decreased significantly (P < 0.05, n = 20 per group) compared with that of the control group. The four-point verbal rating scale at 30 min in the postanaesthesia care unit, visual analogue scale at 6 h on coughing and patient-controlled analgesia morphine consumption during 2-6 h postoperative time were also significantly (P < 0.05, n = 20 per group) reduced in the lidocaine group. In addition, the intraoperative propofol C(e) in the lidocaine group during the periods of intubation, organ resection, closing of chest cavity and extubation was significantly lower (P < 0.05, n = 20 per group) than that in the control group under the same hypnotic depth.Systemic administration of lidocaine could reduce morphine requirements, postoperative pain and intraoperative propofol C(e) of patients undergoing thoracic surgery after propofol-remifentanil-based anaesthesia.Systemic lidocaine decreased the perioperative opioid analgesic requirements but failed to reduce discharge time after ambulatory surgery.In this randomized, blinded, placebo-controlled trial, we evaluated whether systemic lidocaine would reduce pain and time to discharge in ambulatory surgery patients.Sixty-seven patients were enrolled to receive lidocaine or saline infusion perioperatively.Length of postanesthesia care unit (PACU) stay did not differ between groups. Intraoperative opioid use was significantly less in the lidocaine group, both in the PACU and during the total study period but not after discharge. In the PACU, patients in the lidocaine group reported less pain (visual analog scale score 3.1 +/- 2.04 vs 4.5 +/- 2.9; P = 0.043). There were no differences in postoperative nausea and vomiting.Perioperative systemic lidocaine significantly reduces opioid requirements in the ambulatory setting without affecting time to discharge.The effects of preoperative oral pregabalin and perioperative intravenous lidocaine infusion on postoperative morphine requirement in patients undergoing laparatomy.To evaluate and compare the effects of preoperative oral pregabalin and perioperative intravenous lidocaine infusion on postoperative morphine requirement, adverse effects, patients' satisfaction, mobilization, time to first defecation and time to discharge in patients undergoing laparotomy.Eighty patients (18 to 65 years of age) undergoing elective laparotomy were randomly divided into four groups (n=20 in each group): group C, placebo capsules and normal saline infusion perioperatively (control); group L, placebo capsules and lidocaine 1 mg⁄kg intravenous bolus dose followed by 2 mg⁄kg⁄h infusion until skin closure; group P, 150 mg oral pregabalin and normal saline infusion perioperatively; and group PL, 150&nbsp;mg oral pregabalin and lidocaine 2 mg⁄kg⁄h infusion until skin closure. Hemodynamic parameters, visual analogue scale (VAS) scores, analgesic consumption, side effects, time to mobilization, time to first defecation, time to discharge and patients' satisfaction were recorded.VAS scores of group L, group P and group PL were lower than group C (P<0.05). Morphine consumption of group P and group PL was lower than group C (P<0.05). Incidence of nausea in group C was higher than group L and group PL. Time to first defecation and mobilization were shorter in group L and group PL compared with group C (P<0.05).Preoperative oral pregabalin and perioperative intravenous lidocaine infusion decreased postoperative VAS scores. Preoperative oral pregabalin decreased morphine requirement and perioperative intravenous lidocaine infusion hastened gastrointestinal motility and mobilization, and decreased the incidence of nausea in patients undergoing laparotomy. Therefore, preoperative pregabalin with or without lidocaine provides superior pain relief in patients undergoing laparatomy.Efficacy of intraperitoneal and intravenous lidocaine on pain relief after laparoscopic cholecystectomy.This randomized, double-blind, placebo-controlled trial evaluated intraperitoneal (IP) lidocaine administration and intravenous (IV) lidocaine infusion for postoperative pain control after laparoscopic cholecystectomy (LC).Patients who underwent LC were randomized to either group IV (intravenous lidocaine infusion), group IP (intraperitoneal lidocaine administration), or group C (control, IP and IV saline). Outcome measures were total postoperative pain severity (TPPS), total fentanyl consumption (TFC), frequency of administering patient-controlled analgesia (FPB), and a pain control satisfaction score (PCSS).Significantly reduced TPPS, TFC and FPB scores were observed in groups IP (n = 22) and IV (n = 26) compared with controls (n = 24). PCSS was higher in groups IP and IV than in controls. At 2 h postoperation, TPPS was significantly lower in group IP than group IV; at 0-2 h postoperation, FPB was lower in group IP than group IV.The IP administration of lidocaine and IV lidocaine infusion significantly reduced postoperative pain and opioid consumption in LC patients, compared with control infusions. For convenience, IV lidocaine could be used for pain reduction following LC; IP administration places additional burden on the surgeon.Systemic lidocaine to improve quality of recovery after laparoscopic bariatric surgery: a randomized double-blinded placebo-controlled trial.Few multimodal strategies to minimize postoperative pain and improve recovery have been examined in morbidly obese patients undergoing laparoscopic bariatric surgery. The main objective of this study was to evaluate the effect of systemic intraoperative lidocaine on postoperative quality of recovery when compared to saline.The study was a prospective randomized, double-blinded placebo-controlled clinical trial. Subjects undergoing laparoscopic bariatric surgery were randomized to receive lidocaine (1.5 mg/kg bolus followed by a 2 mg/kg/h infusion until the end of the surgical procedure) or the same volume of saline. The primary outcome was the quality of recovery 40 questionnaire at 24 h after surgery.Fifty-one subjects were recruited and 50 completed the study. The global QoR-40 scores at 24 h were greater in the lidocaine group median (IQR) of 165 (151 to 170) compared to the saline group, median (IQR) of 146 (130 to 169), P = 0.01. Total 24 h opioid consumption was lower in the lidocaine group, median (IQR) of 26 (19 to 46) mg IV morphine equivalents compared to the saline group, median (IQR) of 36 (24 to 65) mg IV morphine equivalents, P = 0.03. Linear regression demonstrated an inverse relationship between the total 24 h opioid consumption (IV morphine equivalents) and 24 h postoperative quality of recovery (P < 0.0001).Systemic lidocaine improves postoperative quality of recovery in patients undergoing laparoscopic bariatric surgery. Patients who received lidocaine had a lower opioid consumption which translated to a better quality of recovery.Intravenous lidocaine infusion facilitates acute rehabilitation after laparoscopic colectomy.Intravenous infusion of lidocaine decreases postoperative pain and speeds the return of bowel function. The authors therefore tested the hypothesis that perioperative lidocaine infusion facilitates acute rehabilitation protocol in patients undergoing laparoscopic colectomy.Forty patients scheduled to undergo laparoscopic colectomy were randomly allocated to receive intravenous lidocaine (bolus injection of 1.5 mg/kg lidocaine at induction of anesthesia, then a continuous infusion of 2 mg.kg.h intraoperatively and 1.33 mg.kg.h for 24 h postoperatively) or an equal volume of saline. All patients received similar intensive postoperative rehabilitation. Postoperative pain scores, opioid consumption, and fatigue scores were measured. Times to first flatus, defecation, and hospital discharge were recorded. Postoperative endocrine (cortisol and catecholamines) and metabolic (leukocytes, C-reactive protein, and glucose) responses were measured for 48 h. Data (presented as median [25-75% interquartile range], lidocaine vs. saline groups) were analyzed using Mann-Whitney tests. P<0.05 was considered statistically significant.Patient demographics were similar in the two groups. Times to first flatus (17 [11-24] vs. 28 [25-33] h; P<0.001), defecation (28 [24-37] vs. 51 [41-70] h; P=0.001), and hospital discharge (2 [2-3] vs. 3 [3-4] days; P=0.001) were significantly shorter in patients who received lidocaine. Lidocaine significantly reduced opioid consumption (8 [5-18] vs. 22 [14-36] mg; P=0.005) and postoperative pain and fatigue scores. In contrast, endocrine and metabolic responses were similar in the two groups.Intravenous lidocaine improves postoperative analgesia, fatigue, and bowel function after laparoscopic colectomy. These benefits are associated with a significant reduction in hospital stay.Early oral feeding following laparoscopic colorectal cancer surgery.Early oral feeding (EOF) following colorectal surgery can accelerate patient recovery and shorten hospital stay. However, some patients are intolerable to postoperative early oral feeding. The aim of this study was to evaluate the tolerability of EOF following laparoscopic colorectal cancer surgery and the effects of intravenous lidocaine.The cohort in this randomized, placebo-controlled trial (ClinicalTrial.gov, NCT01346917) comprised of 77 patients undergoing elective laparoscopic colorectal cancer surgery. For patients randomized to the lidocaine group, a loading dose of 1 mg/kg lidocaine prior to skin incision, and a continuous dose of 1 mg/kg/h lidocaine with 90 mg ketorolac (non-steroidal anti-inflammatory drug) (in normal saline, total 240 mL) was administered for 24 h. Patients randomized to the placebo group received a loading dose of 5 mL saline and a continuous dose of 90 mg ketorolac in 240 mL saline. The primary outcome measure was prevalence of postoperative nausea/vomiting and intolerance to EOF.Altogether, 68 patients completed the study and were analyzed. Postoperative nausea and vomiting were higher in the control group but did not reach statistical significance (P = 0.054). Tolerability of EOF was 96.9% in the lidocaine group and 91.7% in the control group (P = 0.62). There was no difference in postoperative pain, opioid consumption, bowel function recovery or postoperative hospital stay.Perioperative intravenous lidocaine administered for laparoscopic colorectal cancer surgery might reduce postoperative nausea and vomiting. However, a high tolerability to EOF following colorectal surgery can be achieved by laparoscopic surgery alone without other supportive treatment.Perioperative intravenous lidocaine infusion for postoperative pain control: a meta-analysis of randomized controlled trials.Various strategies have been proposed for postoperative pain control. Among those, intravenous lidocaine infusion (IVLI) has gained in interest. However, its clinical benefit remains unclear. This systematic review is an evaluation of the analgesic efficacy and safety of IVLI during general anesthesia.A systematic search was performed using MEDLINE, EMBASE, Cochrane, and SCOPUS databases, likewise, grey literature. The review included all randomized controlled trials that used a placebo or any comparator and evaluated IVLI during general anesthesia for any type of surgery. Primary outcomes were pain control and opioid requirement. Secondary outcomes were mortality, length of stay, ileus recovery time, nausea/vomiting, and adverse events. Random effects models were used and heterogeneity was assessed using the I2 index.From 5,472 citations retrieved, 29 studies involving a total of 1,754 patients met eligibility. At six hours postoperatively, intravenous lidocaine infusion reduced pain at rest (weighted mean difference [WMD]-8.70, 95% confidence intervals [CI] -16.19 to -1.21), during cough (WMD -11.19, 95% CI -17.73 to -4.65), and during movement (WMD -9.56, 95% CI -17.31 to-1.80). Intravenous lidocaine infusion also reduced opioid requirement (morphine) (WMD -8.44 mg, 95% CI -11.32 to -5.56), time to first flatus (WMD -7.62 hr, 95% CI-10.78 to -4.45), time to first feces (WMD -10.71 hr, 95% CI -16.14 to -5.28), nausea/vomiting (risk ratios = 0.71, 95% CI 0.57-0.90), and hospital length of stay (WMD -0.17 days, 95% CI -0.41 to 0.07). Abdominal surgery was strongly associated with benefit. For the 12 studies that systematically screened adverse events, the incidence of cardiac and neurologic adverse events was comparable. Eight studies observed toxic plasma levels.Perioperative IVLI reduced postoperative pain and opioid requirement, as well as ileus recovery time, hospital length of stay, and nausea/vomiting. Intravenous lidocaine infusion was effective mainly in abdominal surgery populations. Considering that toxic levels were detected and that adverse events were not systematically screened for in most studies, dose and safety of IVLI should be established before recommending its use.The interaction effect of perioperative cotreatment with dextromethorphan and intravenous lidocaine on pain relief and recovery of bowel function after laparoscopic cholecystectomy.Both dextromethorphan (DM) and IV lidocaine improve postoperative pain relief. In the present study, we evaluated the interaction of DM and IV lidocaine on pain management after laparoscopic cholecystectomy (LC). One-hundred ASA physical status I or II patients scheduled for LC were randomized into four equal groups to receive either: (a) chlorpheniramine maleate (CPM) intramuscular injection (IM) 20 mg and IV normal saline (N/S) (group C); (b) DM 40 mg IM and IV N/S (group DM); (c) CPM 20 mg IM and IV lidocaine 3 mg . kg(-1) . h(-1) (group L); or (d) DM 40 mg IM and IV lidocaine (group DM+L). All treatments were administered 30 min before skin incision. Analgesic effects were evaluated using visual analog scale pain scores at rest and during coughing, time to meperidine request, total meperidine consumption, and the time to first passage of flatus after surgery. Patients of the DM+L group exhibited the best pain relief and fastest recovery of bowel function among groups. Patients in the DM and L groups had significantly better pain relief than those in the C group. The results showed an additional effect on pain relief and a synergistic effect on recovery of bowel function when DM was combined with IV lidocaine after LC.Intraoperative systemic lidocaine for pre-emptive analgesics in subtotal gastrectomy: a prospective, randomized, double-blind, placebo-controlled study.Pre-emptive intravenous lidocaine infusion is known to improve postoperative pain in abdominal surgery. We assessed the effect of intravenous lidocaine infusion in patients who underwent subtotal gastrectomy.We conducted a double-blind, placebo-controlled study with patients undergoing subtotal gastrectomy for early gastric cancer divided into 2 groups: 1 group received intravenous lidocaine infusion preoperatively and throughout surgery, and the other received normal saline infusion (placebo). We assessed postoperative outcomes, including pain scores on a visual analogue scale (VAS), administration frequency of patient-controlled analgesia (PCA) and the amount of consumed fentanyl. Postoperative nausea and vomiting, length of hospital stay (LOS), time to return to regular diet and patient satisfaction at discharge were evaluated.There were 36 patients in our study. Demographic characteristics were similar between the groups. The VAS pain scores and administration frequency of PCA were significantly lower in the lidocaine group until 24 hours after surgery, and fentanyl consumption was significantly lower in this group until 12 hours postoperatively compared with the placebo group. The total amount of consumed fentanyl and the total administration frequency of PCA were significantly lower in the lidocaine than the control group. No significant differences were detected in terms of nausea and vomiting, return to regular diet, LOS and patient satisfaction, and there were no reported side-effects of lidocaine.Intravenous lidocaine infusion reduces pain during the postoperative period after subtotal gastrectomy.Administrée à titre préventif, la perfusion intraveineuse de lidocaïne améliorerait la douleur postopératoire dans la chirurgie abdominale. Nous avons mesuré l’effet d’une perfusion intraveineuse de lidocaïne chez des patients soumis à une gastrectomie subtotale.Nous avons réalisé une étude à double insu avec témoins sous placebo auprès de patients soumis à une gastrectomie subtotale pour un cancer de l’estomac au premier stade. Les patients ont été répartis en 2 groupes : l’un a reçu une perfusion intraveineuse de lidocaïne en préopératoire et tout au long de la chirurgie, tandis que l’autre a reçu une perfusion de solution physiologique (placebo). Nous avons évalué les résultats postopératoires, y compris les scores de douleur sur une échelle analogique visuelle, la fréquence d’administration d’analgésie contrôlée par les patients (ACP) et la quantité de fentanyl utilisée. Les nausées et vomissements postopératoires, la durée du séjour hospitalier, l’intervalle avant la reprise d’une alimentation régulière et la satisfaction du patient au moment de son congé ont aussi été consignés.Notre étude a regroupé 36 patients. Les caractéristiques démographiques étaient similaires entre les groupes. Les scores de douleur à l’échelle analogique visuelle et la fréquence d’administration de l’ACP ont été significativement moindres dans le groupe sous lidocaïne jusqu’à 24 heures après la chirurgie et la prise de fentanyl a aussi été significativement moindre dans ce groupe jusqu’à 12 heures après la chirurgie, comparativement au groupe témoin. La quantité totale de fentanyl utilisée et la fréquence totale d’administration de l’ACP ont été significativement plus faibles dans le groupe sous lidocaïne que dans le groupe témoin. Aucune différence significative n’a été observée pour ce qui est des nausées et vomissements, du retour à une alimentation régulière, de la durée du séjour hospitalier et de la satisfaction des patients et on n’a rapporté aucun effet secondaire associé à la lidocaïne.La perfusion de lidocaïne intraveineuse atténue la douleur durant la période postopératoire après une gastrectomie subtotale.Effect of perioperative intravenous lidocaine administration on pain, opioid consumption, and quality of life after complex spine surgery.The authors tested the primary hypothesis that perioperative IV lidocaine administration during spine surgery (and in the postanesthesia care unit for no more than 8 h) decreases pain and/or opioid requirements in the initial 48 postoperative hours. Secondary outcomes included major complications, postoperative nausea and vomiting, duration of hospitalization, and quality of life.One hundred sixteen adults having complex spine surgery were randomly assigned to perioperative IV lidocaine (2 mg·kg·h) or placebo during surgery and in the postanesthesia care unit. Pain was evaluated with a verbal response scale. Quality of life at 1 and 3 months was assessed using the Acute Short-form (SF) 12 health survey. The authors initially evaluated multivariable bidirectional noninferiority on both outcomes; superiority on either outcome was then evaluated only if noninferiority was established.Lidocaine was significantly superior to placebo on mean verbal response scale pain scores (P < 0.001; adjusted mean [95% CI] of 4.4 [4.2-4.7] and 5.3 [5.0-5.5] points, respectively) and significantly noninferior on mean morphine equivalent dosage (P = 0.011; 55 [36-84] and 74 [49-111] mg, respectively). Postoperative nausea and vomiting and the duration of hospitalization did not differ significantly. Patients given lidocaine had slightly fewer 30-day complications than patients given placebo (odds ratio [95% CI] of 0.91 [0.84-1.00]; P = 0.049). Patients given lidocaine had significantly greater SF-12 physical composite scores than placebo at 1 (38 [31-47] vs. 33 [27-42]; P = 0.002) and 3 (39 [31-49] vs. 34 [28-44]; P = 0.04) months, postoperatively.IV lidocaine significantly improves postoperative pain after complex spine surgery.Intravenous lidocaine versus thoracic epidural analgesia: a randomized controlled trial in patients undergoing laparoscopic colorectal surgery using an enhanced recovery program.Laparoscopy, thoracic epidural analgesia, and enhanced recovery program (ERP) have been shown to be the major elements to facilitate the postoperative recovery strategy in open colorectal surgery. This study compared the effect of intraoperative and postoperative intravenous (IV) lidocaine infusion with thoracic epidural analgesia on postoperative restoration of bowel function in patients undergoing laparoscopic colorectal resection using an ERP.Sixty patients scheduled for elective laparoscopic colorectal surgery were prospectively randomized to receive either thoracic epidural analgesia (TEA group) or IV lidocaine infusion (IL group) (1 mg/kg per hour) with patient-controlled analgesia morphine for the first 48 hours after surgery. All patients received a similar ERP. The primary outcome was time to return of bowel function. Postoperative pain intensity, time out of bed, dietary intake, duration of hospital stay, and postoperative complications were also recorded.Mean times and SD (95% confidence interval) to first flatus (TEA, 24 [SD, 11] [19-29] hrs vs IL, 27 [SD, 12] [22-32] hrs) and to bowel movements (TEA, 44 ±19 [35-52] hrs vs IL, 43 [SD, 20] [34-51] hrs) were similar in both groups (P = 0.887). Thoracic epidural analgesia provided better analgesia in patients undergoing rectal surgery. Time out of bed and dietary intake were similar. Patients in the TEA and IL groups were discharged on median day 3 (interquartile range, 3-4 days), P = 0.744. Sixty percent of patients in both groups left the hospital on day 3.Intraoperative and postoperative IV infusion of lidocaine in patients undergoing laparoscopic colorectal resection using an ERP had a similar impact on bowel function compared with thoracic epidural analgesia.Effect of peri-operative intravenous infusion of lignocaine on haemodynamic responses to intubation, extubation and post-operative analgesia.Lignocaine in intravenous (IV) bolus dose has been used for minimising haemodynamic changes associated with intubation and extubation. Furthermore, IV infusion has been used for post-operative analgesia. We investigated whether IV peri-operative lignocaine (bolus and infusion) would be able to produce both the effects simultaneously in elective laparoscopic cholecystectomies.In this randomised prospective study, 60 patients undergoing elective laparoscopic cholecystectomy were randomly divided into two groups of 30 each. In Group A, patients received 6 ml normal saline as bolus over 10 min followed by 6 ml/h infusion whereas in Group B, patients received preservative free 2% lignocaine 1.5 mg/kg IV bolus (made to a volume of 6 ml with normal saline) administered over a period of 10 min and thereafter an infusion at a rate of 1.5 mg/kg/h (pre-diluted in normal saline made to a volume of 6 ml/h. P < 0.05 was considered as significant.The rise in pulse rate (PR) and mean arterial pressure (MAP) were less in Group B as compared to the Group A (P < 0.05) during intubation as well as during extubation. Furthermore, the Group B had significant longer mean pain-free post-operative period of 5½ h as compared to 54.43 min in the Group A (P < 0.05).Administration of lignocaine infusion attenuates the rise in PR as well as MAP during the peri-intubation and peri-extubation period. Furthermore, infusion of lignocaine significantly increases the mean pain-free period post-operatively.Neuroprotective effects of intravenous lidocaine on early postoperative cognitive dysfunction in elderly patients following spine surgery.This study aimed to evaluate the effects of lidocaine treatment on cognitive impairment in aged patients undergoing spine surgery and to explore the underlying mechanism.Patients were randomly divided into 2 treatment groups: (1) saline (control) and (2) lidocaine. After induction of anesthesia, the lidocaine group received lidocaine as a bolus of 1 mg/kg over 5 minutes, followed by a continuous infusion at 1.5 mg/kg/h until the end of the surgery. We examined the effects of lidocaine treatment on the improvement of cognitive function using the Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE) at preoperation and 3 days postoperation. Serum samples were collected to assess the levels of IL-6, TNF-α, MDA, S100β, and NSE before inducing anesthesia, at the end of surgery, and 3 days after the end of surgery.We found that the MMSE scores in the lidocaine group were markedly higher than those in the control group at 3 days after surgery. Moreover, lidocaine treatment markedly suppressed the release of IL-6, S100β, and NSE into the serum at the end of surgery and 3 days after the end of surgery. In the control group, serum MDA levels increased by 3 days after the end of surgery. The lidocaine group had lower serum MDA levels than those in the control group.Lidocaine may be an effective neuroprotective agent in treating early postoperative cognitive dysfunction in elderly patients undergoing spine surgery.